Washington statutes.
RCW 35.69.020

Resolution of necessity—Liability of abutting property—Reconstruction.

(1) Whenever a portion, not longer than one block in length, of any street in any city is not improved by the construction of a sidewalk thereon, or the sidewalk thereon has become unfit or unsafe for purposes of public travel, and such street adjacent to both ends of said portion is so improved and in good repair, and the city council of such city by resolution finds that the improvement of such portion of such street by the construction or reconstruction of a sidewalk thereon is necessary for the public safety and convenience, the duty, burden, and expense of constructing or reconstructing such sidewalk shall devolve upon the property directly abutting upon such portion except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

(2) An abutting property shall not be charged with any costs of construction or reconstruction under this chapter, or under chapter 35.68 or 35.70 RCW, in excess of fifty percent of the valuation of such abutting property, exclusive of improvements thereon, according to the valuation last placed upon it for purposes of general taxation.

(3) An abutting property shall not be charged with any costs of reconstruction under this chapter, or under chapter 35.68 or 35.70 RCW, if the reconstruction is required to correct deterioration of or damage to the sidewalk that is the direct result of actions by the city or its agents or to correct deterioration of or damage to the sidewalk that is the direct result of the failure of the city to enforce its ordinances.

[ 1996 c 19 s 3; 1965 c 7 s 35.69.020. Prior: 1927 c 203 s 2; RRS s 9332-2.]